Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-604
Municipalities and counties; federal and other funds; expenditures authorized.

It shall be lawful for any municipality and for any county to spend its own revenue and other available resources, including funds received under Title I of the federal State and Local Fiscal Assistance Act of 1972 (Public Law 92-512, 23 U.S.C. chapter 24), or any successor act thereto, for any purpose for which other revenue may be lawfully expended including the following:

(1) Ordinary and necessary maintenance and operating expenses for (a) public safety, including law enforcement, fire protection, and building code enforcement; (b) environmental protection, including sewage disposal, sanitation and pollution abatement; (c) public transportation, including transit systems for streets and roads; (d) health; (e) recreation; (f) libraries; (g) social services as defined in section 68-1202; and (h) financial administration; and

(2) Ordinary and necessary capital expenditures authorized by law.

Laws 1975, LB 345, § 1;

Laws 1978, LB 519, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 18-1735.